Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2256.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3903(a.1) and (d) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3903. Grading of theft offenses.* * *(a.1) Felony of the third degree.--Except as provided in subsection (a) or (a.2), theft constitutes a felony of the third degree if the amount involved exceeds $2,000, or if the property stolen is an automobile, airplane, motorcycle, motorboat or other motor-propelled vehicle, or if the property stolen or disposed of, in any manner, is human remains, or in the case of theft by receiving stolen property, if the receiver is in the business of buying or selling stolen property.* * *123456789101112131415161718 (d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Human remains." Any part of a dead human body, the cremated remains of a dead human body or any other remains of a dead human body."Manmade disaster." Any industrial, nuclear or transportation accident, explosion, conflagration, power failure, natural resource shortage or other condition, except enemy action, resulting from manmade causes, such as oil spills and other injurious environmental contamination, which threatens or causes substantial damage to property, human suffering, hardship or loss of life."Natural disaster." Any hurricane, tornado, storm, flood, high water, wind-driven water, tidal wave, earthquake, landslide, mudslide, snowstorm, drought, fire, explosion or other catastrophe which results in substantial damage to property, hardship, suffering or possible loss of life."War-caused disaster." Any condition following an attack upon the United States resulting in substantial damage to property or injury to persons in the United States caused by use of bombs, missiles, shellfire, nuclear, radiological, chemical or biological means, or other weapons or overt paramilitary actions, or other conditions such as sabotage.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2256PN2949 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425